Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle B. Transfer of Ownership Interest in State Trust Company.

§ 81-27-6.101.
Acquisition of control.

Except as expressly otherwise permitted, a person may not without the prior written approval of the commissioner directly or indirectly acquire control of a state trust company through a change in a legal or beneficial interest in voting securities of a state trust company or a corporation or other entity owning voting securities of a state trust company.

This subarticle does not prohibit a person from negotiating to acquire, but not acquiring, control of a state trust company or a person that controls a state trust company.

This section does not apply to:

The acquisition of securities in connection with the exercise of a security interest or otherwise in full or partial satisfaction of a debt previously contracted for in good faith if the acquiring person files written notice of acquisition with the commissioner before the person votes the securities acquired;

The acquisition of voting securities in any class or series by a controlling person who has previously complied with and received approval under this subarticle or who was identified as a controlling person in a prior application filed with and approved by the commissioner;

An acquisition or transfer by operation of law, will, or intestate succession if the acquiring person files written notice of acquisition with the commissioner before the person votes the securities acquired;

A transaction exempted by the commissioner by rule, regulation or order because the transaction is not within the purposes of this subarticle or the regulation of which is not necessary or appropriate to achieve the objectives of this subarticle.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.102.
Application regarding acquisition of control.

The proposed transferee seeking approval to acquire control of a state trust company or a person that controls a state trust company must file with the commissioner:

An application in the form prescribed by the commissioner;

The filing fee required by statute, rule or regulation;

All information required by rule or that the commissioner requires in a particular application as necessary to an informed decision to approve or reject the proposed acquisition.

If the proposed transferee includes any group of individuals or entities acting in concert, the information required by the commissioner may be required of each member of the group.

Information obtained by the commissioner under this section is confidential and may not be disclosed by the commissioner or any employee of the department except as provided by Subarticle B of Article 2 of this chapter.

If the proposed transferee is not a Mississippi resident, a Mississippi corporation, or an out-of-state corporation qualified to do business in this state, a written consent to service of process on a resident of this state in any action or suit arising out of or connected with the proposed acquisition.

The proposed transferee must publish notice of the application, its date of filing, and the identity of each participant, in the form specified by the commissioner, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the state trust company’s home office is located, promptly after the commissioner accepts the application as complete. Publication of notice of an application filed in contemplation of a public tender offer subject to the requirements of 15 USCS Section 78n(d)(1) may be deferred for not more than thirty-four (34) days after the date the application is filed if:

The proposed transferee requests confidential treatment and represents that a public announcement of the tender offer and the filing of appropriate forms with the Securities and Exchange Commission or the appropriate federal banking agency, as applicable, will occur within the period of deferral; and

The commissioner determines that the public interest will not be harmed by the requested confidential treatment.

The commissioner may waive the requirement that a notice be published or permit delayed publication on a determination that waiver or delay is in the public interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.103.
Hearing and decision on acquisition of control.

Not later than the sixtieth day after the date the notice is published, the commissioner shall approve the application or set the application for hearing. If the commissioner sets a hearing, the commissioner shall conduct a hearing and one or more prehearing conferences and opportunities for discovery as the commissioner considers advisable and consistent with governing statutes and rules. A hearing held under this section is confidential and closed to the public.

Based on the record, the commissioner may issue an order denying an application if:

The acquisition would substantially lessen competition, be in restraint of trade, result in a monopoly, or be in furtherance of a combination or conspiracy to monopolize or attempt to monopolize the trust industry in any part of this state, unless:

The financial condition of the proposed transferee, or any member of a group composing the proposed transferee, might jeopardize the financial stability of the state trust company being acquired;

Plans or proposals to operate, liquidate, or sell the state trust company or its assets are not in the best interests of the state trust company;

The experience, ability, standing, competence, trustworthiness, and integrity of the proposed transferee, or any member of a group comprising the proposed transferee, are insufficient to justify a belief that the state trust company will be free from improper or unlawful influence or interference with respect to the state trust company’s operation in compliance with law;

The state trust company will not be solvent, have adequate capitalization, or be in compliance with the laws of this state after the acquisition;

The proposed transferee has failed to furnish all information pertinent to the application reasonably required by the commissioner; or

The proposed transferee is not acting in good faith.

The anticompetitive effects of the proposed acquisition are clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of acquisition in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served; and

The proposed acquisition is not in violation of law of this state or the United States;

If an application filed under this section is approved by the commissioner, the transaction may be consummated. Any written commitment from the proposed transferee offered to and accepted by the commissioner as a condition that the application will be approved is enforceable against the state trust company and the transferee and is considered for all purposes an agreement under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.104.
Appeal from adverse decision.

If a hearing has been held, the commissioner has entered an order denying the application, and the order has become final, the proposed transferee may appeal the final order to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.

The filing of an appeal under this section does not stay the order of the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.105.
Objection to other transfer.

This subarticle may not be construed to prevent the commissioner from investigating, commenting on, or seeking to enjoin or set aside a transfer of voting securities that evidence a direct or indirect interest in a state trust company, regardless of whether the transfer is included within this subarticle, if the commissioner considers the transfer to be against the public interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-6.106.
Civil enforcement; criminal penalties.

The commissioner may bring any appropriate civil action against any person who the commissioner believes has committed or is about to commit a violation of this subarticle or a rule, regulation or order of the commissioner pertaining to this subarticle.

A person who knowingly fails or refuses to file the application required by Section 81-27-6.102 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction hereof, shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.